Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-257
Contributions by a general partner; powers and liabilities.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his or her participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 25;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 32.